src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:%>'wáa%.áng% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:%>'áng'waa'uuj # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:%>'áng'waa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:%>'áng'waaäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:%>'áng'waa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>'áng'waa'ujaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áng'waa'uujaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:%>'áng'waaäsaa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>'áng'waa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST:%>'áng'waa'ahlanggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'áng'waa'ahlanggíinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE:%>'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>'áng'waa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>'áng'aawaa'ahlang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE:%>'áng'waa'ahl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:%>'áng'waaäseehl # ;

LEXICON CLASS-AY-STEM-2 !!= @CODE@
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:%>áa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST:%>áan # ;
+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:%>áas # ;
+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:%>áa%.ang # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT:%>'ahlánggang # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST:%>'ahlánggan # ;
+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:%>'ahlánggíinii # ;
+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:%>'ahláns # ;
+V+INTENSIVE+PAST:%>áa'ahlang # ;
+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:%>áa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:%>áa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+REFLEXIVE:%>'ahl # ;

!LEXICON CLASS-EEHL-STEM
! :eehl CLASS-EEHL-STEM-1 ;
! :éel CLASS-EEHL-STEM-2 ;
