src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
gid% k̲áy:gid% k̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S (sg) to become the parent of a baby (out of wedlock) [said of the father or the mother]" ;
gyáa% x̲áy:gyáa% x̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to weave, knit, crochet" ;
g̲áy:g̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for X to hemorrhage [said of a body part]" ;
háy:háay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to stop crying" ;
hlg̲áy:hlg̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to dig O (in direction)" ;
ki% x̲áy:ki% x̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to darn O" ;
k̲áy:k̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to thread, string O [said of fish, beads, but not a needle]" ;
ngáy:ngáay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to get singed off, to have the hair singed off [said of hair or the body part where the hair was]" ;
ta% hlg̲áy:ta% hlg̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to dig clams" ;
ta% x̲áy:ta% x̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to weave, knit, crochet" ;
x̲áy:x̲áay CLASS-AY-STEM-2 "for S to weave, knit, crochet O into X" ;
